Nebraska, session 109, LB557.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-233, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-233 For purposes of sections 79-232 to 79-246:
(1) Enrollment option program means the program established in
section 79-234;
(2) Option school district means the public school district that an
option student chooses to attend instead of his or her resident school
district;
(3) Option student means a student that has chosen to attend an
option school district , including an open enrollment option student or a
student who resides in a learning community and began attendance as an
option student in an option school district in such learning community
prior to the end of the first full school year for which the option
school district will be a member of such learning community, but, for
school years prior to school year 2017-18, not including a student who
resides in a learning community and who attends pursuant to section
79-2110 another school district in such learning community;
(4) Open enrollment option student means a student who resides in a
school district that is a member of a learning community, attended a
school building in another school district in such learning community as
an open enrollment student pursuant to section 79-2110, and attends such
school building as an option student pursuant to section 79-235.01;
(4) (5) Resident school district means the public school district in
which a student resides or the school district in which the student is
admitted as a resident of the school district pursuant to section 79-215;
and
(5) (6) Siblings means all children residing in the same household
on a permanent basis who have the same mother or father or who are
stepbrother or stepsister to each other.
Sec. 2. Section 79-234, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
79-234 (1) An enrollment option program is hereby established to
enable any kindergarten through twelfth grade Nebraska student to attend
a school in a Nebraska public school district in which the student does
not reside or a school in the resident school district to which the
student is not assigned subject to the limitations prescribed in section
79-238. The option shall be available any time prior to graduation. once
during elementary school, once during middle school or junior high
school, and once during high school for a total of three times to each
student, except that the option does not count toward such limitation if
such option meets, or met at the time of the option, one of the following
criteria: (a) The student relocates to a different resident school
district, (b) the option school district merges with another district,
(c) the student will have completed either the grades offered in the
school building originally attended in the option school district or the
grades immediately preceding the lowest grade offered in the school
building for which a new option is sought, (d) the option would allow the
student to continue current enrollment in a school district, (e) the
option would allow the student to enroll in a school district in which
the student was previously enrolled as a student, or (f) the student is
an open enrollment option student. Sections 79-232 to 79-246 do not
relieve a parent or guardian from the compulsory attendance requirements
in section 79-201.
(2) The program shall not apply to any student who resides in a
district which has entered into an annexation agreement pursuant to
section 79-473, except that such student may transfer to another district
which accepts option students.
Sec. 3. Section 79-235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-235 For purposes of all duties, entitlements, and rights
established by law, including special education as provided in section
79-1127, and except as provided in section 79-241 and, for open
-3-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
enrollment option students, except as provided in section 79-235.01,
option students shall be treated as resident students of the option
school district. The option student may request a particular school
building, but the building assignment of the option student shall be
determined by the option school district except as provided in section
79-235.01 for open enrollment option students and in subsection (3) of
section 79-2110 for students attending a focus school, focus program, or
magnet school. In determining eligibility for extracurricular activities
as defined in section 79-2,126, the option student shall be treated
similarly to other students who transfer into the school from another
public, private, denominational, or parochial school.
Sec. 4. Section 79-237, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-237 (1) For a student to begin attendance as an option student in
an option school district, the student's parent or legal guardian shall
submit an application to the school board of the option school district.
Such application may be submitted at any time. between September 1 and
March 15 for attendance during the following and subsequent school years.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, applications
submitted after March 15 shall contain a release approval from the
resident school district, or if the student is an option student at the
time of such application and applying to become an option student at a
subsequent option school district, a release approval from the option
school district the student is attending at the time of such application,
on the application form prescribed by the Commissioner of Education
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section. A district may not accept or
approve any applications submitted after such date without such a release
approval. The option school district the student is applying to attend
shall provide the resident school district, and if applicable, the option
school district the student is attending at the time of such application,
with the name of the applicant on or before April 1 or, in the case of an
-4-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
application submitted after March 15, within sixty days after submission.
The option school district the student is applying to attend shall
notify, in writing, the parent or legal guardian of the student and the
resident school district, and, if applicable, the option school district
the student is attending at the time of the application, whether the
application is accepted or rejected on or before April 1 or, in the case
of an application submitted after March 15, within ten sixty days after
submission.
(2) A student who relocates to a different resident school district
after February 1 or whose option school district merges with another
district effective after February 1 may submit an application to the
school board of an option school district for attendance during the
current or immediately following and subsequent school years. Such
application does not require the release approval of the resident school
district or the option school district the student is attending at the
time of such application. The option school district the student is
applying to attend shall accept or reject such application within forty-
five days.
(3) A parent or guardian may provide information on the application
for an option school district that is a member of a learning community
regarding the applicant's potential qualification for free or reduced-
price lunches. Any such information provided shall be subject to
verification and shall only be used for the purposes of subsection (4) of
section 79-238. Nothing in this subsection requires a parent or guardian
to provide such information. Determinations about an applicant's
qualification for free or reduced-price lunches for purposes of
subsection (4) of section 79-238 shall be based on any verified
information provided on the application. If no such information is
provided, the student shall be presumed not to qualify for free or
reduced-price lunches for the purposes of subsection (4) of section
79-238.
-5-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
(2) (4) Applications for students who do not actually attend the
option school district that the student applied to attend may be
withdrawn in good standing upon mutual agreement by the resident and
option school district districts involved.
(5) No option student shall attend an option school district for
less than one school year unless the student relocates to a different
resident school district, completes requirements for graduation prior to
the end of his or her senior year, transfers to a private or parochial
school, or upon mutual agreement of the resident and option school
districts cancels the enrollment option and returns to the resident
school district or the previous option school district the student was
attending immediately prior.
(3) The (6) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section or,
for open enrollment option students, in section 79-235.01, the option
student shall attend the option school district until graduation unless
the student (a) relocates in a different resident school district, (b)
transfers to a private or parochial school, (c) chooses to return to the
resident school district, or (d) options into a subsequent option school
district , except that no student may use the enrollment option program
other than as provided in section 79-234.
(4) (7) In each case of withdrawal and cancellation pursuant to
subsections (5) and subsection (3) (6) of this section, the student's
parent or legal guardian shall provide written notification to the school
board of the option school district or districts and the resident school
district on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Education under
subsection (5) (8) of this section in advance of such withdrawal or
cancellation.
(5) (8) The application and withdrawal or cancellation forms shall
be prescribed by the Commissioner of Education.
(6) (9) An option student who subsequently chooses to attend a
private or parochial school and who is not an open enrollment option
-6-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
student shall be automatically accepted to return to either the resident
school district or option school district upon the completion of the
grade levels offered at the private or parochial school. If such student
chooses to return to the option school district, the student's parent or
legal guardian shall submit another application to the school board of
the option school district which shall be automatically accepted , and
the deadlines prescribed in this section shall be waived.
Sec. 5. Section 79-238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-238 (1) Each (1)(a) Except as provided in this section and
sections 79-235.01 and 79-240, the school board of the option school
district shall adopt by resolution specific capacity standards for
acceptance and rejection of applications for enrollment as an option
student.
(b) Capacity for special education services operated by an option
school district shall be determined on a case-by-case basis. If an
application for option enrollment received by a school district indicates
that the student has an individualized education program under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et
seq., or has been diagnosed with a disability as defined in section
79-1118.01, such application shall be evaluated by the director of
special education services of the school district or the director's
designee who shall determine if the school district and the appropriate
class, grade level, or school building in such school district has the
capacity to provide the applicant the appropriate services and
accommodations.
(c) For all other students, standards may include the capacity of a
program, class, grade level, or school building. Capacity shall be
determined by setting a maximum number of option students that a district
will accept in any program, class, grade level, or school building, based
upon available staff, facilities, projected enrollment of resident
-7-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
students, and projected number of students with which the option school
district will contract based on existing contractual arrangements.
(2) Standards shall only include a random selection process and the
interest of the student and parent or legal guardian. (d) To facilitate
option enrollment, school districts shall annually establish, publish,
and report the capacity for each school building under such district's
control pursuant to procedures, criteria, and deadlines established by
the State Board of Education. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, a school board may by resolution, prior to October 15 of each
school year, declare a program, a class, or a school unavailable to
option students for the next school year due to lack of capacity.
Standards shall not include (a) previous academic achievement, (b)
athletic or other extracurricular ability, (c) disabilities, (d)
proficiency in the English language, (e) residential address, (f) any
capacity measurement of the school district, (g) any measure that
discriminates based on race, ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or any
protected class, or (h) previous disciplinary proceedings except as
provided in section 79-266.01. False or substantively misleading
information submitted by a parent or guardian on an application to an
option school district may be cause for the option school district to
reject a previously accepted application if the rejection occurs prior to
the student's attendance as an option student.
(2) The school board of every school district shall also adopt
specific standards and conditions for acceptance or rejection of a
request for release of a resident or option student submitting an
application to an option school district after March 15 under subsection
(1) of section 79-237. Standards shall not include that a request
occurred after the deadline set forth in this subsection.
(3) Any option school district that is not a member of a learning
community shall give first priority for enrollment to siblings of option
students, except that the option school district shall not be required to
-8-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
accept the sibling of an option student if the district is at capacity
except as provided in subsection (1) of section 79-240.
(4) Any option school district that is in a learning community shall
give first priority for enrollment to siblings of option students
enrolled in the option school district, second priority for enrollment to
students who have previously been enrolled in the option school district
as an open enrollment student, third priority for enrollment to students
who reside in the learning community and who contribute to the
socioeconomic diversity of enrollment at the school building to which the
student will be assigned pursuant to section 79-235, and final priority
for enrollment to other students who reside in the learning community.
The option school district shall not be required to accept a student
meeting the priority criteria in this section if the district is at
capacity as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section except
as provided in section 79-235.01 or 79-240. For purposes of the
enrollment option program, a student who contributes to the socioeconomic
diversity of enrollment at a school building within a learning community
means (a) a student who does not qualify for free or reduced-price
lunches when, based upon the certification pursuant to section 79-2120,
the school building the student will be assigned to attend either has
more students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches than the
average percentage of such students in all school buildings in the
learning community or provides free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision or (b) a student who qualifies for free
or reduced-price lunches based on information collected voluntarily from
parents and guardians pursuant to section 79-237 when, based upon the
certification pursuant to section 79-2120, the school building the
student will be assigned to attend has fewer students qualifying for free
or reduced-price lunches than the average percentage of such students in
all school buildings in the learning community and does not provide free
meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision.
-9-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 79-239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-239 (1) If an application for enrollment as an option student is
rejected by the option school district or if the resident school district
rejects a request for release under subsection (1) of section 79-237,
such the rejecting school district shall provide written notification to
the parent or guardian stating (a) the specific reasons for the
rejection, including, for students with an individualized education
program under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. 1400 et seq., or with a diagnosed disability as defined in section
79-1118.01, a description of services and accommodations required that
the school district does not have the capacity to provide, and (b) the
process for appealing such rejection to the State Board of Education, and
(c) the process for requesting an educational support payment for such
student pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Such notification
shall be sent by certified mail.
(2) The parent or legal guardian may appeal a rejection to the State
Board of Education by filing a written request, together with a copy of
the rejection notice, with the State Board of Education. Such request and
copy of the notice must be received by the board within thirty days after
the date the notification of the rejection was received by the parent or
legal guardian. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act and shall determine whether the procedures
of sections 79-234 to 79-241 have been followed. Any rejection based upon
capacity limitations established under section 79-238 shall be the
responsibility of the school district to prove in any appeal filed with
the state board.
(3) A parent or legal guardian of a student whose option enrollment
application is rejected by the school district shall be eligible to
receive two thousand five hundred dollars to support the student's
education during the applicable school year in which the option
-10-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
enrollment application was denied. Such parent or guardian may apply to
the State Department of Education to receive such educational support
payment. Upon evidence of the rejected application, the State Department
of Education shall provide the educational support payment to the parent
or legal guardian of such student. Such payment shall be used at the
parent's or legal guardian's discretion for the educational support of
the student. Such payment shall not be considered taxable income.
(4)(a) (3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 of
each year thereafter, each school district shall provide to the State
Department of Education information prescribed by the Commissioner of
Education relating to all applications rejected by the option school
district. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, (i) (a)
the number of applications rejected in each public school in such
district and (ii) , (b) an explanation why each application was
rejected , (c) whether each application for option enrollment indicated
that the student had an individualized education program under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et
seq., or had been identified as a student with a disability as defined in
section 79-1118.01, and (d) whether information regarding the
requirements of subsection (4) of section 79-238 was provided to the
applicant.
(b) The Commissioner of Education shall annually compile the
information received pursuant to this subsection and provide a report on
such information electronically to the Legislature beginning on September
1, 2024, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter. The State
Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
Sec. 7. Section 79-240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-240 (1) The application of a student who relocates in a different
school district but wants to continue attending his or her original
-11-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
resident school district and who has been enrolled in his or her original
resident school district for the immediately preceding two years shall be
automatically accepted , and the deadlines prescribed in section 79-237
shall be waived.
(2) The application of an option student who relocates in a
different school district but wants to continue attending the option
school district shall be automatically accepted , and the deadlines
prescribed in section 79-237 shall be waived.
Sec. 8. Section 79-241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-241 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, section
79-611 does not apply to the transportation of an option student. The
parent or legal guardian of the option student shall be responsible for
required transportation. A school district may, upon mutual agreement
with the parent or legal guardian of an option student, provide
transportation to the option student on the same basis as provided for
resident students. The school district may charge the parents of each
option student transported a fee sufficient to recover the additional
costs of such transportation.
(2) Option students who qualify for free lunches shall be eligible
for either free transportation or transportation reimbursement as
described in section 79-611 from the option school district pursuant to
policies established by the school district in compliance with this
section, except that they shall be reimbursed at the rate of one hundred
forty-two and one-half percent of the mandatorily established mileage
rate provided in section 81-1176 for each mile actually and necessarily
traveled on each day of attendance by which the distance traveled one way
from the residence of such student to the schoolhouse exceeds three
miles.
(3) For open enrollment option students who received free
transportation for school year 2016-17 pursuant to subsection (2) of
-12-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
section 79-611, the school board of the option school district shall
continue to provide free transportation for the duration of the student’s
status as an open enrollment option student or for the duration of the
student’s enrollment in a pathway pursuant to subsection (3) of section
79-2110 unless the student relocates to a school district that would have
prevented the student from qualifying for free transportation for the
2016-17 school year pursuant to subsection (2) of section 79-611.
(3) (4) For option students verified as having a disability as
defined in section 79-1118.01, the transportation services set forth in
section 79-1129 shall be provided by the resident school district. The
State Department of Education shall reimburse the resident school
district for the cost of transportation in accordance with section
79-1144.
Sec. 9. Section 79-2,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,127 Except as provided in section 79-2,133, a governing body
may require and collect fees or other funds from or on behalf of students
or require students to provide specialized equipment or specialized
attire for any of the following purposes:
(1) Participation in extracurricular activities;
(2) Admission fees and transportation charges for spectators
attending extracurricular activities;
(3) Postsecondary education costs;
(4) Transportation pursuant to sections 79-241, 79-605 , and 79-611;
(5) Copies of student files or records pursuant to section 79-2,104;
(6) Reimbursement to the school district or educational service unit
for school district or educational service unit property lost or damaged
by the student;
(7) Before-and-after-school or prekindergarten services offered
pursuant to section 79-1104;
(8) Summer school or night school;
-13-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
(9) Parking; and
(10) Breakfast and lunch programs.
Except as provided in this section and sections 79-2,127.01,
79-2,131, and 79-2,132, a governing body shall not collect money pursuant
to the Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act from
students.
Sec. 10. Section 79-2,134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,134 On or before August 1, 2002, and annually each year
thereafter, each school board shall hold a public hearing at a regular or
special meeting of the board on a proposed student fee policy, following
a review of the amount of money collected from students pursuant to, and
the use of waivers provided in, the student fee policy for the prior
school year. The student fee policy shall be adopted by a majority vote
of the school board and shall be published in the student handbook. The
board shall provide a copy of the student handbook to every student, or
to every household in which at least one student resides, at no cost to
the student or household. The student fee policy shall include specific
details regarding:
(1) The general written guidelines for any nonspecialized attire
required for specified courses and activities;
(2) Any personal or consumable items a student will be required to
furnish for participation in extracurricular activities;
(3) Any specialized equipment or attire which a student will be
required to provide for any extracurricular activity;
(4) Any fees required from a student for participation in any
extracurricular activity;
(5) Any fees required for postsecondary education costs;
(6) Any fees required for transportation costs pursuant to sections
79-241, 79-605 , and 79-611;
(7) Any fees required for copies of student files or records
-14-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
pursuant to section 79-2,104;
(8) Any fees required for participation in before-and-after-school
or prekindergarten services offered pursuant to section 79-1104;
(9) Any fees required for participation in summer school or night
school;
(10) Any fees for breakfast and lunch programs; and
(11) The waiver policy pursuant to section 79-2,133.
No fee, specialized equipment or attire, or nonspecialized attire
may be required pursuant to the Public Elementary and Secondary Student
Fee Authorization Act unless the maximum dollar amount of the fee, the
specifications for the specialized equipment or attire, or the
specifications for the nonspecialized attire are specified in the student
fee policy approved by the board. Reimbursement pursuant to subdivision
(6) of section 79-2,127 for property lost or damaged by a student may be
required without specification in the student fee policy.
Sec. 11. Section 79-611, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-611 (1) The school board of any school district shall provide
free transportation, partially provide free transportation, or pay an
allowance for transportation in lieu of free transportation as follows:
(a) When a student attends an elementary school in his or her own
school district and lives more than four miles from such elementary
school as measured by the shortest route that must actually and
necessarily be traveled by motor vehicle to reach the student's
residence;
(b) When a student is required to attend an elementary school
outside of his or her own school district and lives more than four miles
from such elementary school as measured by the shortest route that must
actually and necessarily be traveled by motor vehicle to reach the
student's residence;
(c) When a student attends a secondary school in his or her own
-15-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
Class I, II, or III school district and lives more than four miles from
such secondary school as measured by the shortest route that must
actually and necessarily be traveled by motor vehicle to reach the
student's residence. This subdivision does not apply to any elementary-
only school district that merged with a high-school-only school district
to form a new Class I, II, or III school district on or after January 1,
1997, and before June 16, 2006; and
(d) When a student, other than a student in grades ten through
twelve in a Class V school district, attends an elementary or junior high
school in his or her own Class V school district and lives more than four
miles from such elementary or junior high school as measured by the
shortest route that must actually and necessarily be traveled by motor
vehicle to reach the student's residence.
(2)(a) For school years prior to school year 2017-18 and as required
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-241, the school board of any
school district that is a member of a learning community shall provide
free transportation for a student who resides in such learning community
and attends school in such school district if (i) the student is
transferring pursuant to the open enrollment provisions of section
79-2110, qualifies for free or reduced-price lunches, lives more than one
mile from the school to which he or she transfers, and is not otherwise
disqualified under subdivision (2)(c) of this section, (ii) the student
is transferring pursuant to the open enrollment provisions of section
79-2110, is a student who contributes to the socioeconomic diversity of
enrollment at the school building he or she attends, lives more than one
mile from the school to which he or she transfers, and is not otherwise
disqualified under subdivision (2)(c) of this section, (iii) the student
is attending a focus school or program and lives more than one mile from
the school building housing the focus school or program, or (iv) the
student is attending a magnet school or program and lives more than one
mile from the magnet school or the school housing the magnet program.
-16-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
(b) For purposes of this subsection, student who contributes to the
socioeconomic diversity of enrollment at the school building he or she
attends has the definition found in section 79-2110. This subsection does
not prohibit a school district that is a member of a learning community
from providing transportation to any intradistrict student.
(c) For any student who resides within a learning community and
transfers to another school building pursuant to the open enrollment
provisions of section 79-2110 and who had not been accepted for open
enrollment into any school building within such school district prior to
September 6, 2013, the school board is exempt from the requirement of
subdivision (2)(a) of this section if (i) the student is transferring to
another school building within his or her home school district or (ii)
the student is transferring to a school building in a school district
that does not share a common border with his or her home school district.
(2) (3) The transportation allowance which may be paid to the
parent, custodial parent, or guardian of students qualifying for free
transportation pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall
equal two hundred eighty-five percent of the mileage rate provided in
section 81-1176, multiplied by each mile actually and necessarily
traveled, on each day of attendance, beyond which the one-way distance
from the residence of the student to the school exceeds three miles. Such
transportation allowance does not apply to students residing in a
learning community who qualify for free or reduced-price lunches.
(3) (4) Whenever students from more than one family travel to school
in the same vehicle, the transportation allowance prescribed in
subsection (2) (3) of this section shall be payable as follows:
(a) To the parent, custodial parent, or guardian providing
transportation for students from other families, one hundred percent of
the amount prescribed in subsection (2) (3) of this section for the
transportation of students of such parent's, custodial parent's, or
guardian's own family and an additional five percent for students of each
-17-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
other family not to exceed a maximum of one hundred twenty-five percent
of the amount determined pursuant to subsection (2) (3) of this section;
and
(b) To the parent, custodial parent, or guardian not providing
transportation for students of other families, two hundred eighty-five
percent of the mileage rate provided in section 81-1176 multiplied by
each mile actually and necessarily traveled, on each day of attendance,
from the residence of the student to the pick-up point at which students
transfer to the vehicle of a parent, custodial parent, or guardian
described in subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(4) (5) When a student who qualifies under the mileage requirements
of subsection (1) of this section lives more than three miles from the
location where the student must be picked up and dropped off in order to
access school-provided free transportation, as measured by the shortest
route that must actually and necessarily be traveled by motor vehicle
between his or her residence and such location, such school-provided
transportation shall be deemed partially provided free transportation.
School districts partially providing free transportation shall pay an
allowance to the student's parent or guardian equal to two hundred
eighty-five percent of the mileage rate provided in section 81-1176
multiplied by each mile actually and necessarily traveled, on each day of
attendance, beyond which the one-way distance from the residence of the
student to the location where the student must be picked up and dropped
off exceeds three miles.
(5) (6) The board may authorize school-provided transportation to
any student who does not qualify under the mileage requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and may charge a fee to the parent or
guardian of the student for such service. No transportation payments
shall be made to a family for mileage not actually traveled by such
family. The number of days the student has attended school shall be
reported monthly by the teacher to the board of such public school
-18-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
district.
(6) (7) No more than one allowance shall be made to a family
irrespective of the number of students in a family being transported to
school.
(7) (8) No student shall be exempt from school attendance on account
of distance from the school.
Sec. 12. Section 79-769, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-769 (1) Any one or more member school districts of a learning
community may establish one or more focus programs, focus schools, or
magnet schools. If included as part of the diversity plan of a learning
community, the focus school or focus program shall be eligible for a
focus school and program allowance pursuant to section 79-1007.05.
(2) Focus schools, focus programs, and magnet schools may be
included in pathways across member school districts pursuant to the
diversity plan developed by the learning community coordinating council
pursuant to section 79-2104.
(3) If multiple member school districts collaborate on a focus
program, focus school, or magnet school, the school districts shall form
a joint entity pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act for the purpose
of creating, implementing, and operating such focus program, focus
school, or magnet school. The agreement creating such joint entity shall
address legal, financial, and academic responsibilities and the
assignment to participating school districts of students enrolled in such
focus program, focus school, or magnet school who reside in
nonparticipating school districts.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Focus program means a program that does not have an attendance
area, whose enrollment is designed so that the socioeconomic diversity of
the students attending the focus program reflects as nearly as possible
the socioeconomic diversity of the student body of the learning
-19-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
community, which has a unique curriculum with specific learning goals or
teaching techniques different from the standard curriculum, which may be
housed in a building with other public school programs, and which may
consist of either the complete education program for participating
students or part of the education program for participating students;
(b) Focus school means a school that does not have an attendance
area, whose enrollment is designed so that the socioeconomic diversity of
the students attending the focus school reflects as nearly as possible
the socioeconomic diversity of the student body of the learning
community, which has a unique curriculum with specific learning goals or
teaching techniques different from the standard curriculum, and which is
housed in a building that does not contain another public school program;
(c) Magnet school means a school having a home attendance area but
which reserves a portion of its capacity specifically for students from
outside the attendance area who will contribute to the socioeconomic
diversity of the student body of such school and which has a unique
curriculum with specific learning goals or teaching techniques different
from the standard curriculum; and
(d) Pathway means elementary, middle, and high school focus
programs, focus schools, and magnet schools with coordinated curricula
based on specific learning goals or teaching techniques; and .
(e) Student who contributes to the socioeconomic diversity of
enrollment means (i) a student who does not qualify for free or reduced-
price lunches when, based upon the certification pursuant to section
79-2120, the school building the student will attend either has more
students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches than the average
percentage of such students in all school buildings in the learning
community or provides free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision or (ii) a student who qualifies for free
or reduced-price lunches based on information collected from parents and
guardians when, based upon the certification pursuant to section 79-2120,
-20-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
the school building the student will attend has fewer students qualifying
for free or reduced-price lunches than the average percentage of such
students in all school buildings in the learning community and does not
provide free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility
provision.
Sec. 13. Section 79-1009, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1009 (1)(a) A district shall receive net option funding if (i)
option students as defined in section 79-233 were actually enrolled in
the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the aid is
to be paid or , (ii) option students as defined in such section will be
enrolled in the school year in which the aid is to be paid as converted
contract option students , or (iii) for the calculation of aid for school
fiscal year 2017-18 for school districts that are members of a learning
community, open enrollment students were actually enrolled for school
year 2016-17 pursuant to section 79-2110.
(b) The determination of the net number of option students shall be
based on (i) the number of students enrolled in the district as option
students and the number of students residing in the district but enrolled
in another district as option students as of the day of the fall
membership count pursuant to section 79-528, for the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid
or , (ii) the number of option students that will be enrolled in the
district or enrolled in another district as converted contract option
students for the fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid , and (iii)
for the calculation of aid for school fiscal year 2017-18 for school
districts that are members of a learning community, the number of
students enrolled in the district as open enrollment students and the
number of students residing in the district but enrolled in another
district as open enrollment students as of the day of the fall membership
count pursuant to section 79-528 for school fiscal year 2016-17.
-21-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, net number of
option students means the difference of the number of option students
enrolled in the district minus the number of students residing in the
district but enrolled in another district as option students. For
purposes of the calculation of aid for school fiscal year 2017-18 for
school districts that are members of a learning community, net number of
option students means the difference of the number of students residing
in another school district who are option students or open enrollment
students enrolled in the district minus the number of students residing
in the district but enrolled in another district as option students or
open enrollment students.
(2)(a) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2023-24,
net option funding shall be the product of the net number of option
students multiplied by the statewide average basic funding per formula
student.
(b) For school fiscal year 2023-24 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, net option funding shall be the product of the net number of
option students multiplied by the difference of the statewide average
basic funding per formula student minus the amount of foundation aid paid
per formula student pursuant to section 79-1006.
(3) A district's net option funding shall be zero if the calculation
produces a negative result.
Payments made under this section for school fiscal years prior to
school fiscal year 2017-18 shall be made from the funds to be disbursed
under section 79-1005.01.
Such payments shall go directly to the option school district but
shall count as a formula resource for the local system.
Sec. 14. Section 79-10,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,143 A parent or guardian of any student enrolled in, or in the
process of enrolling in, any school district in the state may voluntarily
-22-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
provide information on any application submitted pursuant to Nebraska
law, rules, and regulations regarding the applicant's potential to meet
the qualifications for free or reduced-price lunches solely for
determining eligibility pursuant to subsection (4) of section 79-238,
subsection (2) of section 79-241, section 79-2,131, section 79-2,133,
subsection (2) of section 79-611, subdivision (1)(c) and subsection (3)
of section 79-2110, or section 85-2104. Each school district shall
process information provided pursuant to this section in the same manner
as the district would to determine the qualification status of the
student for free or reduced-price meals. Each school district shall
comply with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of
1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as such act and section existed on January 1,
2015, and regulations adopted thereunder with regard to any information
collected pursuant to this section. If no such information is provided
pursuant to this section or on an application for free or reduced-price
meals, the student shall be presumed not to qualify for free or reduced-
price lunches.
Sec. 15. Section 79-2104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2104 A learning community coordinating council shall have the
authority to:
(1) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2017-18, levy a common
levy for the general funds of member school districts pursuant to
sections 77-3442 and 79-1073;
(2) Levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for
remodeling of leased elementary learning center facilities, and for up to
fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital
projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant
to subdivision (2)(f) of section 77-3442 and section 79-2111;
(3) Levy for early childhood education programs for children in
poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for contracts with
-23-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
other entities or individuals who are not employees of the learning
community for elementary learning center programs and services, and for
pilot projects pursuant to subdivision (2)(g) of section 77-3442, except
that not more than ten percent of such levy may be used for elementary
learning center employees;
(4) Develop, submit, administer, and evaluate community achievement
plans in collaboration with the advisory committee, educational service
units serving member school districts, member school districts, and the
student achievement coordinator or other department staff designated by
the Commissioner of Education;
(5) Collect, analyze, and report data and information, including,
but not limited to, information provided by a school district pursuant to
subsection (5) of section 79-201;
(6) Approve focus schools and focus programs to be operated by
member school districts;
(7) Adopt, approve, and implement a diversity plan pursuant to
section sections 79-2110 and 79-2118;
(8) Through school year 2016-17, administer the open enrollment
provisions in section 79-2110 for the learning community as part of a
diversity plan developed by the council to provide educational
opportunities which will result in increased diversity in schools across
the learning community;
(8) (9) Annually conduct school fairs to provide students and
parents the opportunity to explore the educational opportunities
available at each school in the learning community and develop other
methods for encouraging access to such information and promotional
materials;
(9) (10) Develop procedures for determining best practices for
addressing student achievement barriers and for disseminating such
practices within the learning community and to other school districts;
(10) (11) Establish and administer elementary learning centers
-24-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
through achievement subcouncils pursuant to sections 79-2112 to 79-2114;
(11) (12) Administer the learning community funds distributed to the
learning community pursuant to section 79-2111;
(12) (13) Establish a procedure for receiving community input and
complaints regarding the learning community;
(13) (14) Establish a procedure to assist parents, citizens, and
member school districts in accessing an approved center pursuant to the
Dispute Resolution Act to resolve disputes involving member school
districts or the learning community. Such procedure may include payment
by the learning community for some mediation services;
(14) (15) Establish and administer pilot projects related to
enhancing the academic achievement of elementary students, particularly
students who face challenges in the educational environment due to
factors such as poverty, limited English skills, and mobility;
(15) (16) Provide funding to public or private entities engaged in
the juvenile justice system providing prefiling and diversion programming
designed to reduce excessive absenteeism and unnecessary involvement with
the juvenile justice system; and
(16) (17) Hold public hearings at its discretion in response to
issues raised by residents regarding the learning community, a member
school district, and academic achievement.
Sec. 16. Section 79-2118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2118 (1) Each learning community, together with its member school
districts, shall develop a diversity plan to provide educational
opportunities pursuant to section sections 79-769 and 79-2110 in each
subcouncil district designed to attract students from diverse
backgrounds, which plan may be revised from time to time. The initial
diversity plan shall be completed by December 31 of the year the initial
learning community coordinating council for the learning community takes
office. The goal of the diversity plan shall be to increase the
-25-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
socioeconomic diversity of enrollment at each grade level in each school
building within the learning community.
(2) Each diversity plan for a learning community shall include
specific provisions relating to each subcouncil district within such
learning community. The specific provisions relating to each subcouncil
district shall be approved by both the achievement subcouncil for such
district and by the learning community coordinating council.
(3) The learning community coordinating council shall report
electronically to the Education Committee of the Legislature on or before
February 1 of each odd-numbered year on the diversity and changes in
diversity at each grade level in each school building within the learning
community and on the academic achievement for different demographic
groups in each school building within the learning community.
Sec. 17. Section 79-2120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2120 On or before March 1, 2009, and February 1 of each year
thereafter, for purposes of determining socioeconomic diversity of
enrollment as defined in section 79-769 79-2110, the State Department of
Education shall certify to each learning community and each member school
district the average percentage of students qualifying for free or
reduced-price lunches in each school building in each member school
district and in the aggregate for all school buildings in the learning
community based on the most current information available to the
department on the immediately preceding January 1. For purposes of this
section, the average percentage of students qualifying for free or
reduced-price lunches in school buildings that provide free meals to all
students pursuant to the community eligibility provision shall equal the
identified student percentage, multiplied by 1.6, calculated pursuant to
the community eligibility provision. The State Board of Education may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 18. Original sections 79-233, 79-234, 79-235, 79-237, 79-238,
-26-

LB557 LB557
2025 2025
79-239, 79-240, 79-241, 79-2,127, 79-2,134, 79-611, 79-769, 79-1009,
79-10,143, 79-2104, 79-2118, and 79-2120, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 19. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
79-235.01 and 79-2110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-27-